Louisiana, session 2026, HB527.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:961(C)(1) and (F)(1), 962(H), 963(I)(1), 964(H), 964.1(B),
966(A) and (C), 967(C)(1), 969(G) and (I), 970(L), 971(B)(1)(a), (2), and (7) and (C)(1) and
(2), 972(D)(1), 975(B), 976(C), 978(H)(1)(a), 979(H), and 980(D)(1) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
§961. Court reporters; generally
* * *
C.(1) The duties of the official court reporter shall be to report in shorthand,
stenotype, or any other recognized manner, and transcribe into longhand by
typewriting all the testimony taken in all civil appealable cases tried in the judicial
district served by the court reporters, when ordered so to do by the presiding judge,
and to furnish for the purpose of appeal the necessary copies of the testimony
required by law for such appeal. In criminal cases tried in the judicial districts, the
official court reporter shall record all portions of the proceedings required by law or
the court and shall, when required by law or the court, transcribe those portions of
the proceedings required, which shall be filed with the clerk of court in the parish
where the case is being tried. Electronic signatures are authorized to certify a
transcript provided that the reporter shall utilize the platform that is authorized by the
judges in the jurisdiction where the official reporter is employed.
* * *
F.(1)(a) In all civil and criminal cases a fee not to exceed one dollar and fifty
cents per thirty-one-line page and twenty-five cents per copy reported and
transcribed shall be charged by and be paid to the court reporter who reported and
transcribed the testimony. (i) In all civil and non-indigent criminal cases, a fee not
to exceed six dollars per thirty-two-line page transcript and not to exceed two dollars
per page per certified copy reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to
the court reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony. Fees may be set up
to the statutory amount by a majority of the judges in the court for which the reporter
is employed.
(ii) In all criminal indigent cases, a fee not to exceed three dollars and fifty
cents per thirty-two-line page transcript and not to exceed one dollar per page per
certified copy reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony. Fees may be set up to the
statutory amount by a majority of the judges in the court for which the reporter is
employed.
Page 2 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
(iii) These fees shall be retained by him the court reporter as compensation,
in addition to the salary as provided in Subsection E of this Section, and shall be
taxed as costs of the case in which such testimony is taken.
(iv) The Judicial Council may review the standard page rates for potential
adjustment every three years from the effective date of this provision.
(b) An electronic copy may be furnished with a certified copy upon request.
(c) Salaried court reporters shall not, in any civil or criminal case, charge a
sitting fee.
(d) When an expedited transcript is requested, the following expedited fees
may be charged:
(i) For transcription within twenty-four hours, a court reporter may charge
two times the allowable per page rate set pursuant Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph.
(ii) For transcription within forty-eight hours, a court reporter may charge
an additional three dollars per page over the allowable per page rate set pursuant to
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(iii) For transcription within five days, a court reporter may charge an
additional one dollar per page over the allowable per page rate set pursuant to
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(b) In the Ninth Judicial District such fee shall not exceed two dollars and
fifty cents per thirty-one-line page.
(c) In the Seventeenth Judicial District such fee shall not exceed two dollars
and fifty cents for each thirty-one line page and fifty cents for each copied page.
(d) In the Third Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall determine the
amount to be paid for each page and for each copied page of all testimony reported
and transcribed in all cases.
(e) In the Second, Fifth, and Eighteenth Judicial Districts, in all cases, except
those to be filed in forma pauperis, a fee determined by a majority of the judges for
each page and each copied page of all testimony reported and transcribed shall be
charged by and paid to the court reporter.
Page 3 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
(f) In the Twenty-Third Judicial District, in all cases, except those to be filed
in forma pauperis, a fee determined by a majority of the judges for each page not to
exceed two dollars and fifty cents for each thirty-one line page and each copied page
of all testimony reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter.
(g) In the Twenty-Eighth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall
determine the amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and
transcribed in all cases, which fee shall not be less than one dollar and fifty cents nor
exceed two dollars and fifty cents per thirty-one-line page.
(h) In the Thirty-Fifth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall
determine the amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and
transcribed in all cases, which fee shall not be less than one dollar and fifty cents nor
exceed two dollars and fifty cents per thirty-one-line page.
(i) In the Twenty-First Judicial District, in all cases, except those to be filed
in forma pauperis, a fee determined by a majority of the judges for each page not to
exceed two dollars and fifty cents for each thirty-one-line page and each copied page
of all testimony reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter.
(j) In the Eighth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall determine the
amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and transcribed in all cases,
which fee shall be not less than one dollar and fifty cents nor exceed two dollars and
fifty cents per thirty-one line page and a fee not to exceed fifty cents per copy per
page of transcribed testimony.
(k) In the Fourth Judicial District, in all cases, except those to be filed in
forma pauperis, a fee determined by a majority of the judges for each page not to
exceed two dollars and fifty cents for each thirty-one-line page and each copied page
of all testimony reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter.
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
(l) In the Sixth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall determine the
amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and transcribed in all cases,
which fee shall not exceed two dollars and fifty cents for each thirty-one line page
and a fee not to exceed fifty cents per copy per page of transcribed testimony.
(m) In the Twenty-Sixth Judicial District, parish of Bossier, in all cases a fee
determined by a majority of the judges for each page not to exceed two dollars and
fifty cents for each thirty-one line page and fifty cents for each copied page of all
testimony reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court reporter.
(n) In the Twenty-Second Judicial District Court, a majority of the judges
shall determine the amount to be paid for each page and for each copied page of all
testimony reported and transcribed in all cases.
(o) In the Thirty-Sixth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall
determine the amount of the fee which shall be paid to the court reporter for the
transcription of each page of all testimony reported and transcribed in all cases,
which fee shall not be less than one dollar and fifty cents and shall not exceed two
dollars and seventy-five cents per thirty-one-line page and the amount of the fee per
copy of each page of transcribed testimony, which shall not exceed twenty-five
cents.
(p) In the Eleventh Judicial District, a majority of the judges en banc shall
determine the amount to be paid for each page and for each copied page of all
testimony reported and transcribed in all cases in an amount not to exceed two
dollars and seventy-five cents per page and in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
cents per copy.
(q) In the Thirty-Ninth Judicial District, a majority of the judges shall
determine the amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and
transcribed in all cases, which fee shall not exceed two dollars and seventy-five cents
for each thirty-two-line page and a fee not to exceed twenty-five cents per copy per
page of transcribed testimony.
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
(r) In the Twenty-Ninth Judicial District, a majority of the judges en banc
shall determine the amount to be paid for each page and for each copied page of all
testimony reported and transcribed as required by law, which fee shall not exceed
two dollars and seventy-five cents for each thirty-two-line page and a fee not to
exceed twenty-five cents per copy per page of transcribed testimony.
(s) In the Thirty-Third Judicial District Court, in all civil and criminal
appeals, a fee not to exceed two dollars and seventy-five cents per thirty-two-line
page and twenty-five cents per copy reported and transcribed shall be charged by and
be paid to the court reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony. These fees
shall be retained by him as compensation in addition to any other salary and shall be
taxed as costs of the case in which such testimony is taken.
(t) In the Thirty-Seventh Judicial District, the judge shall determine the
amount to be paid for each page of all testimony reported and transcribed in all cases,
which fee shall not exceed two dollars and seventy-five cents for each thirty-two-line
page and a fee not to exceed twenty-five cents per copy per page of transcribed
testimony.
(u) In the Twentieth Judicial District Court, a majority of the judges shall
determine the amount to be paid for each page and for each copied page of all
testimony reported and transcribed in all cases.
* * *
§962. Court reporters for the First Judicial District
* * *
H. As compensation, each court reporter shall be paid a salary from the fund
hereinafter created of not less than one thousand seventy-five dollars per month, and
such additional amounts as are determined by a majority of the judges; plus an
amount to be determined by a majority of the judges at the rate established pursuant
to R.S. 13:961 for each thirty-one line thirty-two line page and for each copied page
of all testimony reported and transcribed in all cases, said salary to be paid monthly
and other compensation as submitted for payment. The length of the transcript page
may be changed from thirty-one lines to twenty-five lines at the discretion of a
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
majority of the court. All recording and transcribing machines, typewriters, supplies,
and extra help shall be paid by such court reporters personally. Additional
compensation, recording and transcribing machines, supplies, and extra help may be
provided to the court reporters for work in criminal court as required and as ordered
by the majority of the judges, the cost thereof to be paid from the criminal court
fund, or indigent defender fund, any other available fund, or as otherwise provided
by law and as ordered by a majority of the judges.
* * *
§963. Court reporters for Thirteenth Judicial District
* * *
I.(1)(a) In all civil cases, a fee of two dollars and twenty-five cents per page
and twenty-five cents per copy of each page reported and transcribed at the rate
established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to each court
reporter for reports and for transcribing the testimony.
(b) In criminal cases, a fee not to exceed two dollars per page and twenty-
five cents per copy of each page reported and transcribed at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to such court reporter for
performing such duties.
* * *
§964. Court reporters for Fourteenth Judicial District
* * *
H. In all cases, a majority of the judges shall determine the amount of the fee
which shall be at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 and shall be paid to the
court reporter for the transcription of each page of all testimony reported and
transcribed and the amount of the fee per copy of each page of transcribed testimony.
The provisions of this Subsection shall also apply to cases which are reported but
not transcribed. Such fees shall be retained by the reporter as compensation, in
addition to the salary provided for in Subsection G of this Section, and shall be taxed
as costs of the suit in which the testimony is taken.
* * *
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
§964.1. Fourteenth Judicial District; indigent transcript fund; reporter's fees
* * *
B. Court reporters shall be paid three dollars and twenty-five cents per thirty-
two-line page for such work, and seventy-five cents per page for each copy at the
rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961, as funds become available, all such
payments to be made from the criminal indigent transcript fund by the court
administrator.
* * *
§966. Nineteenth judicial district Judicial District; payments in suits under pauper
act
A. Out of its general fund, the governing authority for East Baton Rouge
Parish shall pay the court reporters of the nineteenth judicial district Nineteenth
Judicial District for the taking and transcribing of the testimony in suits filed under
the provisions of R.S. 13:4525 through 13:4529 at the rate of seventy-five cents per
legal page of thirty-one lines pursuant to R.S. 13:4529 at the rate established in R.S.
13:961. The original and one copy shall be furnished in cases appealable to the court
of appeals; in cases appealable to the supreme court the original and three copies
shall be furnished. The payment shall be made monthly to the court reporters upon
presentation of an itemized statement of the costs approved by any of the judges of
the district. The payments to be made by the governing authority under the
foregoing provisions shall not exceed the gross sum of fifteen hundred dollars for
any one year to each of the court reporters.
* * *
C. All judgments rendered in cases, in which the party availing himself of
the provisions of R.S. 13:4525 through 13:4529 R.S. 13:4529 shall be cast for costs,
together with a statement of such costs, shall be recorded by the clerk of court in the
mortgage records of the parish of East Baton Rouge. Such judgments when recorded
shall operate as a judicial mortgage in favor of the governing authority of East Baton
Rouge parish Parish for the amount of costs paid to the court reporters. The
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
governing authority of East Baton Rouge parish Parish, at its expense, may have this
judgment and statement of costs (or a certified copy thereof) recorded in the
mortgage records of any other parish or parishes, and when recorded the judgment
shall operate as a judicial mortgage in favor of the governing authority of East Baton
Rouge parish Parish for the amount of costs paid.
* * *
§967. Twenty-Fourth Judicial District; court reporters; civil filing fees
* * *
C.(1) In all cases on appeal, the reporter shall be paid a fee not to exceed two
dollars and fifty cents for each original page transcribed at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 and, when a copy is requested by a litigant, shall furnish
such copy and be paid a fee not to exceed one dollar for each page thereof the rate
established pursuant to R.S. 13:961, except that in criminal cases on appeal by
indigent defendants, no more than a total of two dollars and seventy-five cents for
each page transcribed the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961, including all
copies necessary for appeal, shall be charged to and paid from any fund established
by law for the payment of expenses incurred in the defense of indigent persons in
criminal proceedings. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to make the
governing authority of the parish of Jefferson responsible for the expenses or costs
associated with the preparation of transcripts for an indigent defendant in a criminal
proceeding, including but not limited to bills of exceptions, trials, motions, hearings
on writs, or any other costs associated with an appeal in a criminal proceeding.
* * *
§969. Court reporters for the Twenty-Ninth Judicial District Court
* * *
G. In all civil cases, a fee determined by a majority of the judges en banc for
each original page and for each copied page of testimony, which fee shall not exceed
two dollars and seventy-five cents for each thirty-two-line page and a fee not to
exceed twenty-five cents per copy per page of transcribed testimony, at the rate
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to the court reporter
for reports and for transcribing the testimony which shall be retained by him the
court reporter as compensation, in addition to the salary as provided herein, and shall
be taxed as costs of the suit in which the testimony is taken to be collected by the
clerk of court, except in pauper cases; payment. Payment of the fees shall be made
primarily by the appellant immediately upon the transcription of the evidence, and
the court reporter shall not be required to file the transcript with the clerk of court
before payment. Should If the appellant fail or refuse fails or refuses to make such
payment, the appellee or any other party to the suit may make the same payment and
have it assessed as cost. Even though Though counsel may attempt to procure a
transcript of the entire record by alleging that the entire record is necessary to
support a motion for a new trial, the trial judge shall not order the entire transcript
to be typed unless he deems it indispensable to the record of the motion or
proceedings.
* * *
I. The court reporters shall record such criminal proceedings as may be
required by law or as ordered by the court. No fee shall be charged for taking
evidence on assignments of error, motions, or other pleadings in criminal cases,
unless approved by the presiding judge. In all criminal cases where a transcript is
required by law, a fee determined by a majority of the judges en banc for each
original page and each copied page of testimony, which fee shall not exceed two
dollars and seventy-five cents for each thirty-two-line page and a fee not to exceed
twenty-five cents per copy per page of transcribed testimony, at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to the court reporters for
reporting and transcribing the testimony which shall be retained by him the court
reporters as compensation in addition to the salary as provided herein. When so
approved, any such payment may be made from the criminal court cost fund. In such
cases, however, only properly designated portions of the record shall be transcribed.
* * *
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
§970. Court reporter for Twenty-sixth Twenty-Sixth Judicial District for Webster
Parish
* * *
L. Additionally, in civil and criminal cases, the Webster Parish Police Jury
shall be paid two dollars and fifty cents per thirty-one-line legal size page and fifty
cents per page at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 for copies for all
testimony transcribed by the court reporters. This charge shall be taxable as court
costs and shall be advanced to the court reporter assigned to the case for delivery to
the Webster Parish Police Jury for deposit in the clerk of court reporter's fund.
* * *
§971. Sixteenth and Twenty-Seventh Judicial Districts; additional court reporters;
fees charged by court reporters; indigent transcript fund
* * *
B.(1)(a) In the Twenty-Seventh Judicial District, in all civil cases, a fee of
three dollars and fifty cents per page for the original and fifty cents per page at the
rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 for copies reported and transcribed shall be
charged by and paid to the court reporter who reports and transcribes the testimony
and shall be retained by him the court reporter as compensation in addition to the
salary as provided herein.
* * *
(2) In all criminal cases, except those involving indigent defendants, a fee
of three dollars and fifty cents per page for the original, and fifty cents for each copy
thereafter reported and transcribed at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961
shall be paid to the court reporter who reports and transcribes the testimony and shall
be retained by him the court reporter as compensation in addition to the salary as
provided herein. The payment of fees in criminal cases involving indigent
defendants shall be governed by the provisions of R.S. 13:4529.
* * *
(7) Court reporters shall be paid three dollars and fifty cents per
thirty-one-line page for such work, and twenty-five cents per page for each copy at
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961, as funds become available, with all such
payments to be made from the criminal indigent transcript fund by the court.
* * *
C.(1)(a) In the Sixteenth Judicial District, in all civil cases, a fee of two
dollars and fifty cents per page for the original and fifty cents per page each for the
first and second copies for cases reported and transcribed at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to the court reporter who
reports and transcribes the testimony and shall be retained by him the court reporter
as compensation in addition to the salary as provided herein.
(b) In all civil cases which are reported but not transcribed, one-half of the
fees provided in this Subsection for originals shall be charged by and be paid to the
reporter.
(c) In every civil appealable case set for trial, the court reporter may demand
and secure from the plaintiff, before the trial of the case begins, a bond to guarantee
the payment of the fees to the reporter, except where said plaintiff is exempt by
existing law from paying costs in advance or as they accrue. No bond shall be
required in in forma pauperis cases, but the court reporter may test by rule the
plaintiff's right to the benefits of Articles 5181 through 5188 of the Code of Civil
Procedure.
* * *
(2) In all criminal cases, except those involving indigent defendants, a fee
of two dollars and fifty cents per page for the original and fifty cents per page each
for the first and second copies reported and transcribed at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be paid to the court reporter who reports and
transcribes the testimony and shall be retained by him the court reporter as
compensation in addition to the salary as provided herein. The payment of fees in
criminal cases involving indigent defendants shall be governed by the provisions of
R.S. 13:4529.
* * *
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
§972. Court Reporters for the Twenty-Fifth Judicial District
* * *
D.(1) In all cases, the reporter shall be paid a fee of two dollars and seventy-
five cents for each original thirty-two line page transcribed and, where a copy is
requested by a litigant, shall furnish such copy and be paid a fee of twenty-five cents
for each page thereof at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961. At the request
of any of the parties to any proceedings, or at the order of a district judge, the court
reporter shall transcribe all or part of the testimony or other matter taken down and
shall furnish as many copies thereof as may be required by law for an appeal. The
reporter, except when ordered by the judge, shall not be required to file or furnish
any transcribed testimony until the transcription fee is paid. If those parties, or the
judge, direct the original transcription, each party shall pay the expense of
transcribing the testimony offered by him the court reporter. No fee shall be allowed
for transcribing matter other than testimony, objections and rulings thereon, bills,
notes of evidence, and such other matters as may be ordered by the judge. All such
fees shall be paid directly to the court reporter performing the service as additional
compensation and shall be taxed as costs.
* * *
§975. Court reporters and judges' secretaries for the twenty-third judicial district
Twenty-Third Judicial District
* * *
B. In civil cases which are reported and transcribed, a fee of one dollar and
twenty-five cents per page at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be
charged by and paid to the reporter. Provided, however, that no additional fee shall
be charged for reporting or transcribing civil cases except when ordered for purposes
of appeal of a decision of the court or when ordered by the court of appeal.
* * *
§976. Thirty-Second Judicial District; additional court reporters; transcript fees
* * *
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
C. The civil and criminal transcript fee for all court reporters in the Thirty-
Second Judicial District should not exceed two dollars and seventy-five cents per
thirty-one-line page and twenty-five cents per page copy the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961. These fees shall be charged by and be paid to the court
reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony, shall be retained by him the
court reporter as compensation in addition to his salary, and shall be taxed as costs
of the suit in which the testimony is taken.
* * *
§978. Court reporters for Thirtieth Judicial District
* * *
H.(1)(a) In all civil cases, a fee of one dollar and fifty cents per page and
fifty cents per page additional for the first copy, thirty-five cents per page additional
for copies reported and transcribed beyond the first copy, at the rate established
pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged by and paid to the court reporter for reports
and for transcribing the testimony which shall be retained by him the court reporter
as compensation in addition to the salary as provided in this Section, and shall be
taxed as costs of the suit in which the testimony is taken to be collected by the clerk
of court, except in pauper cases. Payment of the fees shall be made primarily by the
plaintiff immediately upon the transcription of the evidence, and the court reporter
shall not be required to file the transcript with the clerk of court before payment.
* * *
§979. Court reporters for thirty-eighth judicial district Thirty-Eighth Judicial
District
* * *
H. In civil and criminal cases which are reported and transcribed, a fee of
two dollars and twenty-five cents per page for originals, and twenty-five cents per
page for each copy, at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961 shall be charged
by and paid to the reporter. In those civil cases which are reported but not
transcribed, one-half of the fee provided herein for originals shall be charged by and
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
paid to the reporter. Such fees shall be retained by the reporter, as compensation in
addition to the salary provided for in Subsection G of this Section, and shall be taxed
as costs of the suit in which the testimony is taken.
* * *
§980. Court reporters for the Thirty-Fourth Judicial District
* * *
D.(1) In all cases on appeal, the reporter shall be paid a fee not to exceed
three dollars for each original page transcribed and where a copy is requested by a
litigant, shall furnish such copy and be paid a fee of one dollar and fifty cents for
each page thereof at the rate established pursuant to R.S. 13:961. At the request of
any of the party proceedings, or at the order of a district judge, the court reporter
shall transcribe all or part of the testimony or other matter taken down and shall
furnish as many copies thereof as may be required by law for an appeal. For matters
not on appeal, a litigant requesting a transcript of testimony or other matter
transcribed shall enter into a private civil contract with the court reporter for the
payment of fees applicable to those contracts. Such fees shall be in accordance with
fees customarily charged in the judicial district for depositions. The reporter, except
when ordered by the judge, shall not be required to file or furnish any transcribed
testimony until the transcription fee is paid. If those parties, or the judge, direct the
original transcription, each party shall pay the expense of transcribing the testimony
offered by him the court reporter. No fee shall be allowed for transcribing matter
other than testimony, objections and rulings thereon, bills, notes of evidence, and
such other matters as may be ordered by the judge. All such fees shall be paid
directly to the court reporter performing the service as additional compensation and
shall be taxed as costs.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 13:970(K) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. Act No. 126 of the 2017 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana,
Act No. 232 of the 2020 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana, and Act Nos. 52
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-816 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 527
and 228 of the 2023 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana are hereby repealed in
their entirety and shall never become effective.
Section 4. The provisions of Act No. 447 of the 2018 Regular Session of the
Legislature of Louisiana enacting R.S. 13:961(F)(1)(v) are hereby repealed in their entirety
and shall never become effective.